Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE A. HEALTH COVERAGE IN GENERAL

CHAPTER 1208. IDENTITY OF AVAILABLE EMPLOYEE OF HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN ISSUER

Sec. 1208.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies only to a health benefit plan that provides benefits for medical or surgical expenses incurred as a result of a health condition, accident, or sickness, including an individual, group, blanket, or franchise insurance policy or insurance agreement, a group hospital service contract, or an individual or group evidence of coverage or similar coverage document that is offered by:

(1) an insurance company;

(2) a group hospital service corporation operating under Chapter 842;

(3) a fraternal benefit society operating under Chapter 885;

(4) a stipulated premium company operating under Chapter 884;

(5) a reciprocal exchange operating under Chapter 942;

(6) a health maintenance organization operating under Chapter 843;

(7) a multiple employer welfare arrangement that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 846; or

(8) an approved nonprofit health corporation that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 844.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 1208.002. DISCLOSURE REQUIRED. After an oral or written request by an insured or enrollee of a health benefit plan, the plan issuer shall provide to the insured or enrollee the name or employee identifier of the issuer's employee who is available to respond to questions or other communication from the insured or enrollee relating to coverage and benefits provided under the plan to the insured or enrollee. The issuer shall also provide:

(1) the employee's mailing address;

(2) the municipality and state of the employee's business location; and

(3) the employee's job title.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.